Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8239
Statewide trauma system; rules and regulations; state trauma medical director and regional medical directors; appointment.

(1) The department, in consultation with and having solicited the advice of the State Trauma Advisory Board, shall maintain the statewide trauma system.

(2) The department, with the advice of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and develop injury prevention strategies to carry out the Statewide Trauma System Act.

(3) The Director of Public Health or his or her designee shall appoint the state trauma medical director and the regional medical directors.

(4) The department, with the advice of the board, shall identify the state and regional activities that create, operate, maintain, and enhance the statewide trauma system.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 39;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 692;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 100;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 109.